Utah statutes.
17-18a-605.   Prohibited acts.

(1)  Within the state, the attorney may not consult with or otherwise represent a person charged with a crime, misdemeanor, or breach of a criminal statute or ordinance.

(2)  A public prosecutor may not prosecute or dismiss in the name of the state a case in which the public prosecutor has previously acted as legal counsel for the accused.

(3)  A public prosecutor may not after the filing of an indictment or information and without the consent of the court:

(a)  compromise a prosecution; or

(b)  enter a plea of nolle prosequi.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

